Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.120

Hearings—Time and place.

All hearings may be conducted at any time or place within the limits of the judicial district, and such cases may not be heard in conjunction with other business of any other division of the superior court.

[ 1981 c 299 s 9; 1979 c 155 s 64; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 66.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.